Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-28-101. Right of condemnation.

A pipeline corporation has the right, in pursuance of the general laws authorizing condemnation of private property for works of internal improvement, to appropriate as an easement or right-of-way of lands necessary for its pipelines; and also land, and rights in land for the development, construction and operation of underground storage reservoirs for natural gas; and also land for pump stations and terminal facilities over any land of any person or corporation through which a pipeline may be located; provided, that no one of the streets, alleys, squares or highways within the corporate limits of any municipality in the state shall be entered upon or used by any corporation for laying pipelines and conductors, or otherwise, until the consent of the municipal authorities shall have been obtained, and an ordinance shall have been passed prescribing the terms on which the same may be done.

Acts 1919, ch. 98, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 2360a3½; mod. Code 1932, § 3998; Acts 1961, ch. 242, § 1; 1963, ch. 249, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2801.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 7, 17.

Attorney General Opinions. A pipeline corporation has the right to condemn an easement for pipelines that will be used for the transportation and distribution of liquid petroleum products such as gasoline, kerosene, home heating oil, or jet fuel, OAG 01-171, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (12/12/01).

65-28-102. Tolls or freight rates.

A pipeline corporation has the right to exact and receive the same tolls or charges for the transportation of products as other common carriers.

Acts 1919, ch. 98, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 2360a4; Code 1932, § 3999; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2802.

65-28-103. Discrimination prohibited — Rights and liabilities — Jurisdiction of Tennessee public utility commission — Pilot program to allow intrastate pipeline corporations to transport natural gas to end users.

All such corporations shall furnish equal facilities to all persons and shall not discriminate in services, in charges, or otherwise, either for or against any person, and shall be charged with all duties, responsibilities, and liabilities imposed upon public utility corporations by the laws of this state, and be subject to the Tennessee public utility commission.

As a pilot project through the end of the year 2003, and notwithstanding any state or local law to the contrary, any intrastate natural gas pipeline corporation, subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission as a public utility, may transport natural gas to end users in Tennessee only if such natural gas is produced from Tennessee wells located in any county contained within the second, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh or twelfth senatorial districts, and/or in the smallest county by population located in the fifteenth senatorial district, as these districts exist on June 17, 1999, and only if the end users of such natural gas are located in these counties; provided that no such pilot project shall be permitted within the chartered service area of a utility district created by private act. Such intrastate natural gas pipeline corporations shall not transport intrastate natural gas to end users that are served by a municipal utility or by a utility district or within a utility district's chartered service area on June 17, 1999, unless:

The end user has been served by an interstate pipeline; or

At the option of the utility district or municipal utility, such intrastate natural gas pipeline or end user assumes any contractual obligation of the utility district or municipal utility to an interstate natural gas pipeline incurred on behalf of such end user which remains after termination of service by such end user prior to the end of the term of the contract, tariff or other arrangement pursuant to which the end user receives service.

At the option of the utility district or municipal utility, such intrastate natural gas pipeline may serve end users not now being served by a municipal utility or by a utility district or within a utility district's chartered service area. This subdivision (b)(2) shall not prohibit service to end users specifically authorized to be served in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(A).

Any contractual arrangements made by an intrastate natural gas pipeline corporation for transportation of natural gas pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) shall remain in effect according to their terms if such agreements are entered into, or permits are granted, during the pilot project, even though the term of such transportation agreement shall be for a longer term than the pilot project and without regard to whether the pilot project is extended or is not extended.

Acts 1919, ch. 98, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 2360a5; mod. Code 1932, § 4000; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2803; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 1999, ch. 408, § 1; 2000, ch. 690, § 1; 2001, ch. 307, §§ 3, 4; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Apportionment of capital for purposes of franchise tax, § 67-4-2111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of proposed classification of intrastate natural gas pipeline corporations, OAG 99-117, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 117 (5/14/99).

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of state statutes prohibiting area price discrimination. 67 A.L.R.3d 26.

65-28-104. Gas pipeline systems — Definitions.

As used in §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Federal safety standards” means the minimum federal safety standards adopted by the United States department of transportation pursuant to the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act (49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.) or any amendments thereto which may be adopted in the future;

“Gas” means natural gas, petroleum gas, flammable gas, or gas which is toxic or corrosive;

“Gas public utilities” means any person, firm, corporation or other legal entity of any kind engaged in the transportation of gas, and includes the state of Tennessee, every county in the state of Tennessee, every municipality in the state of Tennessee and every utility district created under title 7, chapter 82, which has not been certified with the department of transportation under the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act, every public body or corporation of whatever kind in the state of Tennessee, and every private or nonpublic entity, when engaged in the transportation of gas;

“Pipeline systems” means new and existing pipeline rights-of-way and any pipeline, equipment facility, and building, used by a public utility in the transportation and distribution of gas or the treatment of gas during the course of transportation and distribution, but “rights-of-way” as used in §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111 does not authorize the commission to prescribe the location or routing of any pipeline facility; and

“Transportation of gas” means the gathering, transmission, and distribution of natural gas by pipeline, or its storage, and the transmission and distribution of all kinds of gas other than natural gas.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 1; 1973, ch. 217, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-2804; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted the definition of “commission” for the definition of “authority” and substituted “commission” for “authority” in the definition of “pipeline systems”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-105. Safety standards.

All pipeline systems used in this state shall be constructed, operated and maintained in such a manner as to at all times be in compliance with the defined minimum safety standards and amendments thereto, as well as such additions and amendments as may be ordered by the commission from time to time.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 2; T.C.A., § 65-2805; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-106. Powers and duties of commission.

The commission has the right, power and authority to provide and make certifications, reports and information to the secretary of the United States department of transportation; to enter into agreements with the secretary to carry out the purposes of §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111; to enforce safety standards in the state including enforcement of federal safety standards as permitted in the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act (49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.); and to exercise regulatory jurisdiction over the safety of pipeline systems and transportation of gas in accordance with permission granted by the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act.

The commission has the right, power and authority to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to ensure that each pipeline system is operating in compliance with the required safety standards and to enforce such compliance. It has the right, power and authority to require each public utility to make, maintain and file such books, papers, records and documents as the commission may deem necessary and to require that these books, papers, records and documents be made available to members of the commission and their employees upon request. Authorized representatives of the commission shall be authorized to inspect all pipeline systems, facilities and equipment and shall have the right of access and entry to all buildings and property owned, leased or operated by such systems.

The commission shall be authorized to employ such inspectors or other qualified employees as may be necessary to carry out §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, §§ 3, 4, 8; T.C.A., §§ 65-2806, 65-2807, 65-2811; Acts 1991, ch. 439, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in (a), (b), and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-107. Injunctions.

Upon petition of the commission, the chancery court, sitting in equity, in any county in which a violation of §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111 exists shall have jurisdiction to restrain such violation and to enforce compliance with the safety standards required by such sections.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 5; T.C.A., § 65-2808; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-108. Penalty provisions.

Any person who violates §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111, or of any regulation issued under such sections, is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each such violation for each day that such violation persists, except that the maximum civil penalty shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for any continuing series of violations.

Any civil penalty may be compromised by the commission. In determining the amount of such penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the appropriateness of such penalty to the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of a violation, shall be considered. The amount of such penalty, when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, shall be paid within thirty (30) days after the determination to the commission, to be used for the purposes of §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111; and, if not paid within such time, may be recovered in a civil action brought by the commission in the chancery court of any county in which a violation exists.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 6; T.C.A., § 65-2809; Acts 1991, ch. 439, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” three times in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-109. Limit of commission's jurisdiction.

Nothing in §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111 shall be deemed to confer upon the commission any additional power and jurisdiction to supervise or regulate the rates, services, franchises or other matters pertaining to pipeline systems or transportation of gas except with respect to the enforcement of federal safety standards prescribed by the secretary of the United States department of transportation and such additions and amendments as ordered by the commission; nor shall anything in §§ 65-28-104 — 65-28-111 be deemed to confer upon the commission any power to adopt or continue in force any standards for pipeline systems or transportation of gas, including carbon dioxide transported via interstate pipeline, subject to the jurisdiction of the federal power commission as prohibited in the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act (49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.).

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 7; T.C.A., § 65-2810; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 36; 2010, ch. 846, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-110. Inspection, control, and supervision fees.

Every public utility engaged in the operation of gas pipeline systems in this state to which this chapter applies, with the exception of those utilities presently paying a fee as provided by chapter 4, part 3 of this title, shall pay to the state, on or before April 1 of each year, a fee for the inspection and supervision of the standards of safety as prescribed by this chapter. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the commission's gas safety inspection program and shall be segregated in an account so designated.

Such fee shall be paid by such public utility engaged in the operation of gas pipeline systems in addition to any and all property, franchise, license and other taxes, fees and charges fixed, assessed or charged by law against such utility, but shall not be levied against those utilities paying a fee under chapter 4, part 3 of this title.

The amount of such fee is to be measured by the number of active gas meters in service within the service area of each public utility, municipal gas system and gas utility district. Where there are no meters, the fee is to be measured by the number of active services. The fee fixed and assessed against and to be paid by each public utility, municipal gas system, and gas utility district is as follows:

A flat rate of one hundred dollars ($100) for all meters in service of up to one hundred fifty-four (154) meters;

Sixty-five cents (65¢) for each meter in service from one hundred fifty-five (155) to two thousand (2,000) meters;

Fifty cents (50¢) for each meter in service from two thousand one (2,001) to ten thousand (10,000) meters; and

Thirty-five cents (35¢) for each meter in service exceeding ten thousand (10,000) in number; or

In the case of interstate pipeline companies or systems, or companies or systems having no gross receipts, or no active meters in service, or other service in this state, but traversing the state in its transmission of gas service, the fee is to be assessed at the rate of four dollars seventy-five cents ($4.75) per mile of twenty-four inch (24") equivalent pipeline.

In no case shall the fee to be paid be less than one hundred dollars ($100), which will be the minimum inspection fee to be paid by the public utility engaged in the operation of gas pipeline systems subject to such fee and not presently paying a fee as provided in chapter 4, part 3 of this title, nor more than seventy-eight thousand dollars ($78,000), which shall be the maximum paid by such companies; provided, that for a petroleum gas system subject to the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act (49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.), except a system serving ten (10) or more customers from a common tank, the fee shall be twenty dollars ($20.00).

The inspection, control and supervision fees provided for in this section shall become due and payable on April 1 of each year.

The inspection fees and penalties provided for in this section shall be collected by the commission.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, §§ 9-14; 1973, ch. 217, § 2; 1974, ch. 756, § 1; 1976, ch. 686, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 65-2812 — 65-2817; Acts 1989, ch. 146, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 36, 37; 2017, ch. 94, § 60.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in (a) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-28-111. Default in payment of fees and penalties.

The default in payment of fees and civil penalties, penalties therefor, suits for collection, counsel fees and liens for any fees and penalties in case of default in the payment of any such fee or part thereof, as provided for in this chapter, shall be governed by §§ 65-4-308 and 65-4-309.

Acts 1970, ch. 558, § 15; T.C.A., § 65-2818.